Privacy Statement
General Remarks
We value your privacy greatly. The service, products and applications
          you use are owned and operated by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd, No.1086, Bihua
          Road, Tongzhou District, Nantong City, Jiangsu Province, China, 226300
          ("we" or "Alpha ESS"). This Privacy Statement
          describes the personal data processed by Alpha ESS and the means and
          purposes of Alpha ESS processing such personal data. You can choose
          not to use the website of Alpha ESS including the app (Website);
          however, especially if you want to use specific services through our
          Website, we need to collect and process some of your corresponding
          personal data.
As we are an international company with a global business, we may
          provide you with a privacy policy addendum tailored for your region as
          provided below in "2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that
          applies to me?” (hereinafter: “your Privacy Policy”).
This Privacy Statement may be modified and updated from time to time.
          If we modify and update the Privacy Statement, we will promptly notify
          you on our Website and such Privacy Statement will come into effect
          upon publication.
If you have not reached the age specified in your Privacy Policy, you
          may not use the products offered by us.
How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?
We are an enterprise operating on a global scale, with a globally
          distributed deployment solution. Currently, regulations on personal
          data and privacy protection are not identical around the world.
          Therefore, we have provided below different Privacy Policies to meet
          the legal requirements in different parts of the world. In the
          respective Privacy Policy, we inform you on how we protect your
          legitimate rights and interests regarding your personal data and on
          how we meet the legal and regulatory requirements for privacy and data
          protection at the place you are (“your region”). The Privacy Policy
          that applies to your region takes precedence over the present Privacy
          Statement. Please choose your Privacy Policy, that is the Privacy
          Policy applying to your region, e.g. where you live in Germany, please
          choose the German Privacy Policy:
[German Privacy Policy],
[Australian Privacy Policy],
[Singapore Privacy Policy],
[China Privacy Policy]
If you do not find your corresponding region here, please read this
          Privacy Statement carefully to learn about the universal privacy
          protection measures and policies we have adopted to protect your
          personal data, which we maintain as a global standard .
Please make sure that you click on the respective Privacy Policy
          correctly according to your region to read about our processing of
          your personal data under specific legal requirements and our measures
          for the protection of your personal data.
If you do not know which Privacy Policy applies to you, please
          contact:
Michael Steininger-Yang
Tel: +49 6103 459 160 1
Email: europe@alpha-ess.de
This Privacy Statement is to be read in conjunction with any other
          notices, contractual clauses and consent clauses that apply in
          relation to the collection, use and disclosure of your personal data
          by us.
If you have any questions, comments or suggestions about this Privacy
          Statement and your Privacy Policy, you may contact us using contact
          information set forth in the corresponding Privacy Policy above.
What kinds of personal data does Alpha ESS collect and hold?
Alpha ESS may collect and hold the following personal data about you:
name;
address;
email address;
contact number;
account username;
details of your interactions and communications with us;
online and digital services data, such as cookies (see section 7 for
            further information on cookies that we collect);
data required to be collected by law; and
publicly available data.
How does Alpha ESS collect my personal data?
Alpha ESS collects the data you provide to us, including in your
          interactions and communications with Alpha ESS, and your product usage
          data. We mainly collect personal data from you directly, such as via
          your Alpha ESS account. Other data is collected by us through your
          interactions with us and use of and interactions with the products and
          related communications.
We may also obtain your personal data from the third parties, where
          you have consented, or are deemed to have consented to the same. We
          protect data obtained from third parties for the purposes described in
          this Privacy Statement and your Privacy Policy, and honour any other
          restrictions imposed by the data source.
Am I obliged to disclose my personal data?
You can make different choices about the technology you use and the
          data you share. When we request you to provide your personal data, you
          can refuse. As many of our products require you to provide us with
          certain personal data in order that we can provide our services to
          you, we may not be in a position to continue to serve you if you
          choose not to disclose the data required so that we can provide you
          with a product or feature. Similarly, if we are legally required to
          collect personal data from you, or are required to enter into a
          contract with or fulfill a contract for you, and you do not provide
          the personal data necessary to do so, we may not be able to enter into
          the said contract, fulfill the said contract for you, or may have to
          suspend or revoke your right to use our product. If this is the case,
          we will notify you.
In cases where the provision of data is not mandatory, if you choose
          not to provide your personal data to us, you may not be able to use
          the features that require such data (e.g., the Fault Warranty
          feature).
For a detailed description of the processing of your personal data
          collected by us, please refer to your Privacy Policy as provided above
          in "2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?”
For what purposes does Alpha ESS collect my personal data?
We may collect, store, use and disclose your personal data to provide
          you with our products and services. The purpose for which we usually
          collect, store, use and disclose your personal data depends on how you
          interact with us, however, typical purposes for which we use and
          disclose your personal data include to:
Provide our products and services to you, including updates,
            protection and troubleshooting, and support.
Resolve possible device failure problems.
Improve and develop our products.
Respond to queries, requests and feedback from you.
Verify your identity.
Transmit your data to third parties including our third party
            service providers and agents, and relevant governmental and/or
            regulatory authorities, in order to perform the abovementioned
            purposes and to serve you.
We may disclose your personal data to third parties for the reasons
          set out above, for other purposes explained at the time we collect
          your personal information, or where we are otherwise allowed or
          required to do so under law.
Some of the third parties we may disclose your personal data to
          include:
other members of our company group;
our service providers and advisors who assist us in managing our
            products and services;
third parties in the context of a corporate restructure of Alpha
            ESS; and
regulatory bodies, government agencies and law enforcement bodies,
            to comply with our legislative or regulatory obligations.
For a detailed description of the processing of your personal data by
          us, please refer to your Privacy Policy as provided above in "2.
          How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?”.
Cookies and Tokens
Alpha ESS pages use Cookies, which are text files with small pieces of
          data placed on a device to store data about your use of our Website
          and services. Cookies are used for essential functioning of a Website
          and to contribute to a better user experience. For example, we use
          cookies and tokens to enable you to log in to the Website. You can set
          your web browser preferences to block certain cookies. However, if
          your device has disabled cookies, some features of the Website and
          services will not work properly.
We respect the "Do Not Track (DNT)" signal or similar
          technology provided by your system when you have disabled cookies.
Tokens are used for the login authentication, so that there is no need
          to log in every time you enter the Website. The token is saved in the
          system for 2 hours, and when you log out, the system will
          automatically delete the token. By using our Website, platforms and/or
          products, you consent to our use of cookies and tokens to collect and
          use your personal data for the abovementioned purposes.
If needed we do provide a more detailed description of such processing
          in your Privacy Policy as provided above in "2. How do I find the
          Privacy Policy that applies to me?”.
Your rights as data subject
We fully respect and protect the legitimate rights and interests of
          all kinds of personal data that you enjoy as the subject of personal
          data. These rights are differently stipulated in the laws of different
          countries and regions. For more information on your rights and how to
          exercise your rights, please refer to your Privacy Policy provided in
          "2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?”.
You can exercise your personal rights without paying any fees.
          According to the requirements of the data protection law in your
          region, we will respond to your request within 30 calendar days.
          Please note that, for security reasons, we may ask you to verify your
          identity.
Security safeguards
We employ commercially reasonable physical, administrative and
          technical safeguards to maintain the integrity and security of your
          personal data, and the data security of users and devices. These
          safeguards include the following:
We use encryption and other technology to ensure that your personal
          data is securely stored on our servers and transmitted via the
          internet.
Our team monitors security threats continuously to help protect your
          personal data from unauthorized access, loss and disclosure.
Our team is provided ongoing security and privacy training, to be able
          to efficiently identify security issues.
We maintain physical security measures to protect your personal
          information, such as physical locks and security systems at our
          premises.
You should be aware, however, that no method of transmission over the
          Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure. While
          security cannot be guaranteed, we strive to protect the security of
          your information and are constantly reviewing and enhancing our
          information security measures.
If you believe for any reason that there has been any unauthorized
          access, use, collection, disclosure or other risks relating to your
          personal data held by us, please inform us immediately using the
          contact information provided in your Privacy Policy provided above in
          "2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?”.
As far as provided by law, if a security incident occurs that affects
          the security of your personal data, we will notify you and provide you
          with recommendations on how to reduce or prevent related risks from
          occurring and other information, if necessary.
Data retention period
We will cease to retain personal data about or relating to you, or
          remove the means by which the data can be associated with you, as soon
          as it is reasonable to assume that such retention is no longer
          necessary for the purposes for which such personal data was collected,
          including the purposes stated herein and in your Privacy Policy,
          unless we are required or entitled to retain the personal data for a
          longer period of time under specific legal requirements. We will
          determine the appropriate retention period based on the legal
          requirements, volume, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, at
          the end of which we will destroy your personal data.
If you explicitly request us to delete your personal data, we will
          honour this request promptly and will no longer retain your personal
          data. However, we will not delete your personal data if we are
          entitled or obliged to further storage on the basis of a different
          legal ground than your consent or despite your request or your
          objection. If we are unable to destroy the data for technical reasons,
          we will take appropriate measures to remove the means by which the
          data can be associated with you and prevent further use of your
          personal data.
Third-party SDK collection and use instructions
For the stable operation of the Alpha ESS services or to realize the
          relevant features, we may utilize Software Development Kits (SDKs)
          provided by third parties to achieve the aforementioned purposes. We
          will comply with requirements provided by the applicable law, e.g.
          conclude the necessary contracts. We will conduct strict security
          checks on the Application Programming Interfaces (APIs) used by our
          authorized partners to access the information and the SDKs, and agree
          with our authorized partners on strict data protection measures to
          ensure that they process personal data in accordance with this policy
          and any other relevant confidentiality and security measures.
The third-party SDKs we utilize mainly serve the needs of you and
          other users, so we may adjust the third-party SDKs to meet new service
          requirements and changes in business features. We will timely provide
          you with the latest information on the third-party SDKs we utilize in
          "2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?”
How to contact us
We respect your rights and protect your personal data. You can contact
          us for more information about how we handle your personal data, to
          make a compliant, or to exercise your personal data rights, by using
          the contact information provided in your Privacy Policy as provided in
          " 2. How do I find the Privacy Policy that applies to me?” .
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://alphaess.blob.core.windows.net/app/PrivacyPolicy/appPrivacy/addendum/de_en_web.html?mode=light:
Privay Policy for the Cloud of Alpha ESS CO. Ltd., China
Alpha ESS CO Ltd. (hereinafter referred to as „the Responsible“ or
        „Alpha ESS“ or „we“ or „us“) is pleased as the operator of the homepage
        https://cloud.alphaess.com/ and as the operator of the Alpha Cloud
        (hereinafter also „our cloud“) about your interest in our cloud. The
        following informs you about the processing of personal data when using
        our cloud.
Table of contents
I. Definitions
II. Controller, representative according to Art. 27 GDPR and data
          protection officer
III. Principles for the processing of personal data
IV. General data processing in connection with the provision of our
          website
V. Customer account for the use of the services of Alpha Cloud
VI. Tokens
VII. Email contakt
and ticket system
VIII. Data processing by third parties and transfer of data to third
          countries
IX. Your rights as a data subject
X. SSL Encryption
XI. Reservation of change
I. Definitions
Our privacy policy uses terms defined in the EU General Data Protection
        Regulation (GDPR). In order to make the privacy policy readable and
        understandable, we have explained these terms below:
(1) Personal data
According to the GDPR, personal data is any information relating to an
        identified or identifiable natural person. This means information such
        as your name, your date of birth, your address, your e-mail address,
        your IP address or your telephone number, as well as your user behavior.
        In contrast, information that is not directly associated with your real
        identity - such as generally preferred websites by all users or the
        number of users of a site - is not referred to as personal data.
(2) Person affected
Data subject means any identified or identifiable natural person whose
        personal data is processed by the controller.
(3) Processing
Processing means any operation or set of operations which is performed
        upon personal data, whether or not by automatic means, such as
        collection, recording, organization, filing, storage, adaptation or
        alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission,
        dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination,
        restriction, erasure or destruction.
(4) Restriction of processing
Restriction of processing is the marking of stored personal data with
        the aim of limiting their future processing.
(5) Person responsible or controller and representative according to
          Art. 27 GDPR
The person responsible or controller is the natural or legal person,
        public authority, agency or other body which alone or jointly with
        others determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal
        data. Where the purposes and means of such processing are determined by
        Union or Member State law, the controller or the specific criteria for
        its designation may be provided for under Union or Member State law.
Insofar as the data controller has its registered office outside the
        European Union, a representative must be appointed in accordance with
        Art. 27 GDPR. The representative must be established in one of the
        Member States in which the data subjects whose personal data are
        processed in connection with the goods or services offered to them or
        whose behavior is monitored are located. The representative shall be
        appointed by the controller or processor to serve as a point of contact,
        in addition to or in place of the controller or processor, in particular
        for supervisory authorities and data subjects on all matters relating to
        the processing to ensure compliance with this Regulation.
        "Representative" therefore means a natural or legal person
        established in the Union who has been appointed in writing by the
        controller or processor in accordance with Article 27 GDPR and
        represents the controller or processor in relation to their respective
        obligations under this Regulation.
(6) Processor
Processor means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or
        other body that processes personal data on behalf of the controller.
(7) Recipient
A recipient is a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or
        other body to whom personal data is disclosed, whether or not that
        person, agency or other body is a third party. However, public
        authorities that may receive personal data in the context of a specific
        investigative task under Union or Member State law shall not be
        considered as recipients.
(8) Third party
Third party means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency or
        other body other than the data subject, the controller, the processor
        and the persons authorized to process the personal data under the direct
        responsibility of the controller or the processor.
(9) Consent
Consent shall mean any freely given indication of the data subject's
        wishes for the specific case in an informed and unambiguous manner in
        the form of a statement or any other unambiguous affirmative act by
        which the data subject indicates that he or she consents to the
        processing of personal data relating to him or her.
II. Person responsible for processing, representative according to
          Art. 27 GDPR and data protection officer
(1)
Person responsible for processing
Alpha ESS CO., Ltd.
No. 888, Jiuhua Road, Nantonmg High-tech Zone,
Nantong City, Jiangsu Province, China, 226300
email: info@alpha-ess.com
The aforementioned responsible party is also referred to hereinafter
        collectively as "the responsible party" or "Alpha
        ESS" or "we" or "us".
Since the controller does not have a registered office in the EU, a
        representative has been appointed in accordance with Article 27 of the
        GDPR.
(2) Representative according to Art. 27 GDPR
Alpha ESS Europe GmbHPaul-Ehrlich-Strasse 1a
63225 Langen
Deutschland
Phone: +49 (0) 6103 – 4591601
Email:
europe@alpha-ess.de
Internet:
https://www.alpha-ess.de
(3) Data protection officer
The data protection officer of Alpha ESS Europe GmbH is Michael
        Steininger-Yang. The data protection officer can be reached at the above
        address.
III. Principles for the processing of personal data
(1) Scope of processing of personal data
As a matter of principle, we collect and use personal data of our users
        only insofar as this is necessary for the provision of a functioning
        cloud as well as our content and services. The collection and use of
        your personal data within the framework of our cloud is regularly only
        carried out after your consent. However, an exception applies in those
        cases in which it is not possible to obtain prior consent for actual
        reasons and the processing of the data is nevertheless permitted by
        legal regulations.
(2) Legal basis for the processing of personal data
The data transmitted or collected by you will be collected, used,
        processed, stored and, if necessary - if required by law or
        contractually necessary - forwarded to third parties exclusively within
        the framework of the applicable data protection laws (GDPR, Federal Data
        Protection Act, State Data Protection Acts and Telemedia Data Protection
        Act).
Various legal bases for the processing of your personal data arise from
        Art. 6 GDPR, each of which is referred to in this privacy policy:
Art. 6 para. 1 a) GDPR is the legal basis for processing operations of
          personal data, if consent of the data subjects is given.
Art. 6 para. 1 b) GDPR is the legal basis for the processing of
          personal data which becomes necessary for the performance of a
          contract to which the data subject is a party. This legal basis also
          refers to those processing operations which are necessary for the
          performance of pre-contractual measures.
If we have to process personal data in ordert o fulfill a legal
          obligation of our company, Art. 6 para. 1) c) GDPR shall be the legal
          basis for this.
Art. 6 para. 1 d) GDPR serves as the legal basis if vital interests of
          the person affected by the data processing or another natural person
          make it necessary to process their personal data.
If the processing of personal data is necessary to protect a
          legitimate interest of our company or a third party and the interests,
          fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject do not override
          this first interest of our company or a third party, this processing
          is carried out on the legal basis of Art. 6 para. 1) f) GDPR.
Storing information in the end user's terminal equipment, e.g. via
        tokens or cookies, or accessing information that is already stored in
        the terminal equipment is only permissible if it is covered by one of
        the following justifications:
– § 25 para. 1 TTDPA: If the end user has consented on the basis of
        clear and comprehensive information. The consent has to be given
        according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a) GDPR;
– § 25 para. 2 Nr. 1 TTDPA: When the sole purpose is to carry out the
        transmission of a message over a public telecommunications network; or
– § 25 para. 2 Nr. 2 TTDPA: If the storage or access is absolutely
        necessary so that the provider of a telemedia service can provide a
        telemedia service expressly requested by the user.
(3) Data deletion and storage duration
As soon as the purpose of storing the respective personal data of the
        data subject ceases to apply, such data shall be deleted or blocked.
        However, storage beyond this point in time may take place if this has
        been provided for in European or national regulations, laws or other
        provisions to which we, as the data controller, are subject. Data will
        also be blocked or deleted if a storage period stipulated by the
        aforementioned standards expires, unless there is a necessity for the
        continued storage of such data for the conclusion or performance of a
        contract.
IV. General processing activities in connection with the provision of
          our website
(1) Visit of our website
When you visit the website on which the cloud is provided, we process
        the personal data described below to enable convenient use of the
        functions. If you only visit our website without already being
        registered in the cloud, it is generally not necessary for you to
        provide us with personal data. Rather, during your visit to our website,
        we automatically collect, use and store information that is transmitted
        to us by the respective browser used.
Information about your browser: Type, language and the version you are
          using (e.g. Mozilla Firefox, Microsoft Internetexplorer, Apple Safari,
          Google Chrome)
The operating system you are using
The internet service provider you use
Your IP address
Date and time of your access
Websites from which your system accesses our website
Websites that are accessed by your system via our website
Content of the request (specific page)
Access status/http status code
Amount of data transferred in each case
The data listed above cannot be assigned to specific persons by us. We
        do not combine this data with other data sources, i.e. this data is not
        stored together with other personal data such as your name, address,
        telephone number or email address.
(2) Legal basis
Legal basis for the storage of the data is Art. 6 para. 1 f) GDPR, as
        our legitimate interests in this storage, as set out below, outweigh
        your interests, fundamental rights and freedoms: The IP address is
        considered a personal data. The temporary storage of the IP address by
        the system is necessary to enable a transmission of our website, on
        which we maintain the cloud, to your browser. For this purpose, the IP
        address must remain stored for the duration of the session.
(3) Duration of storage
The data is deleted as soon as it is no longer required to achieve the
        purpose for which it was collected. In the case of the collection of
        data for the provision of our website, it is deleted when the respective
        session has ended.
(4) Possibility of objection and removal
The collection of data for the provision of our website is mandatory for
        the operation of the website. Consequently, there is no possibility for
        you to object in this respect.
V. Customer account to use the services in the Alpha Cloud
(1) Data for the customer account - registration as a user
The use of the monitoring services, including weather data display, and
        the customer service in the Alpha Cloud requires registration (creation
        of a customer account) in the cloud. To create a customer account, the
        following data is required, not all of which constitutes personal data
        per se:
(a) Mandatory data for registration in CLOUD:
- role of registrant: end-user or installer
- Email address
- password and check code used to authenticate and access accounts
- SN (device number) and SN check code
(b) Optional data– we ask for your consent:
- Postal code
- address
- Country
- Phone number
- contact person
Time zone
- Installation date of device monitored
- Automatic update of the cloud
(
c) Registration process
There are two types of registered users: end-user registration and
        installer registration. Please choose according to the actual situation.
        After selecting the type, you need to fill in the account e-mail as User
        Name and set the account password first. You must use your valid e-mail
        address. If your email address cannot receive emails, you will not be
        able to register your account successfully.
Furthermore, you need to fill in SN (Serial number) and SN check code.
        When you enter your product serial number (SN), the installation date
        will automatically recognize when your system was installed by the
        installer. If it is not recognized, you will need to manually select the
        installation date for your device. You can also scan the code to obtain
        the product serial number. The checkcode is the check code on your
        system.
We ask you to indicate optional data, that is choose your language;
        indicate a Contact person; Country, Address, Postal code; Phone Number,
        Time zone, Installation time – if it needs to be indicated manually and
        to give your consent to the processing of such data.
Please read the "Privacy Policy" and "Terms of
        Service" before proceeding to the next step.
When you click "Submit", the system will check if the
        checkcode is correct, if not, the registration will not be successful.
        Contact phone number is optional, other fields are required. Please read
        the "Privacy Policy" and "Terms of Service" before
        proceeding to the next step.
You can choose whether to accept the automatic update of system
        firmware. After clicking OK, a registration activation email will be
        sent to your email address, you have to go to the email address and
        click on the activation in order to register successfully.
Click on the activation link in the email and your account will be
        activated and you will be redirected to the login page automatically
        (Double-Opt-in). At the same time, we store the double-opt-in and the
        date of your registration along with the time. This data is not passed
        on to third parties.
If you create a customer account for our cloud, we will collect and
        store the data you entered during registration exclusively for
        pre-contractual services, for the fulfillment of the contract or for the
        purpose of customer care (e.g. to provide you with an overview of your
        previous orders or inquiries with us).
In the course of the registration process, your consent to this
        processing will be obtained and reference will be made to this privacy
        policy. The data collected by us in this process will be used
        exclusively for the provision of the customer account.
(2) Data processing for monitoring services
From the SN (Serial Number) we can see Device and Usage data about your
        device, the products and the functions that you use, including
        information about your hardware and software, the performance of our
        products, and your settings as well as Device and configuration data,
        that is data about your device, device configuration, and neighboring
        networks, for example, the IP address, SN, device identifiers, location
        and language settings, and neighboring WLAN access points of the device.
        All such data are used for device interaction only and not for any other
        purposes. We use this information to provide you with the monitoring
        information. Without this information no monitoring services are
        possible.
In order to have accurate weather data we process Country, post code and
        address. These information are send to a subcontractor providing the
        weather information with whom we have concluded a Controller/Processor
        Agreement as well. Without this information no weather data can be
        shown.
(3) Customer service - Trouble shooting data
Troubleshooting and help data: data submitted when you contact Alpha ESS
        for help, such as authentication information and data related to your
        device and its corresponding products, as well as the problems you face.
        The processing of personal data from an inquiry for trouble shooting
        sent to us serves solely to process the contact and the problem. In this
        context we may process contact data, such as name, address data,
        telephone numbers, e-mail address to contact you and device, usage and
        configuration data in order to solve problems and instruct our
        sub-contractors with whom we have concluded a Controller/Processor
        Agreement pursuant to Art. 28 GDPR.
(4)
Legal basis
Pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1) lit. b) GDPR, the legal basis for data
        processing is the contract that we conclude with you for the provision
        of our services. The legal basis for the processing of data, if and
        insofar as your consent is given, is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR. In
        accordance with Art. 7 para. 3) GDPR, you can revoke the consent given
        to us to open and maintain the customer account at any time with effect
        for the future. For this purpose, you only need to inform us of your
        revocation.
(5) Purpose of processing
(a) Weather Data Service: We provide a weather data service by
        forwarding the country, address and zip code to a weather data service.
(b) Monitoring: We provide an overview of the performance of the
        products from our product portfolio when they are connected to the
        Internet via Wi-Fi. To do this, you must register the products in the
        cloud under Basic settings "Add device".
(c) We offer a question service - customer service - under ticket
        system. Here you can report problems and ask questions.
(6) Storage duration
(a) Weather data: Weather data is only shown on the day monitoring takes
        place. There will be no history of weather data provided for user.
        However, there will be anonymous storage for scientific use.
(b) Performance Data of Alpha ESS products (Monitoring): Device, usage,
        configuration data
Data shown in monitoring will be part of the device history and will be
        saved by Alpha Ess. However, this data will not be deleted if we are
        entitled or obliged to continue storing it on the basis of a legal
        ground other than your consent or despite your objection.
(c) Customer service – ticket, suggestions
Data will be part of device history and will be saved by Alpha Ess as
        long as the device is registered. If registration of a device is
        cancelled data will be deleted. However, this data will not be deleted
        if we are entitled or obliged to continue storing it on the basis of a
        legal ground other than your consent or despite your objection.
(d) Account data
Account data, like email address, contact address, contact person and
        phone number as well as Credentials (password and check code used to
        authenticate and access accounts) are stored as long as the account is
        registered.
Data storage can be terminated by deleting the customer account.
        However, this data will not be deleted if we are entitled or obliged to
        continue storing it on the basis of a legal ground other than your
        consent or despite your objection. The data collected in this respect
        will be deleted, for example, as soon as processing is no longer
        necessary. In doing so, however, we must observe retention periods under
        tax and commercial law.
(7) Possibility of objection and removal
You have the option to revoke your consent to the processing of personal
        data at any time [see X. (8) Right of revocation below].
VI. Tokens
(1) Description
In addition to the previously mentioned data, technical tools are used
        for various functions when you use our cloud, in particular tokens,
        which can be stored on your end device. These functions are not based on
        cookies, but on similar technical mechanisms, such as Flash cookies,
        HTML objects or an analysis of your browser settings. The tokens used by
        Alpha Ess are information in a database that are stored in the device
        memory of your end device and assigned to the cloud you are using.
        Tokens allow certain information to flow to the entity that sets them.
        They are used for authentification purposes. Tokens cannot execute
        programs or transfer viruses to your terminal device.. This cloud uses
        the following types of tokens, whose functionality and legal basis we
        will explain below.
(2) Necessary and optional tokens
A distinction is made between technically mandatory tokens and optional
        tokens:
Mandatory, technically necessary for the function of the cloud: The
        technical structure of the cloud requires that we use techniques, in
        particular tokens. Without these techniques, our cloud cannot be used
        (completely correctly) or the support functions cannot be enabled. These
        are basically tokens that are deleted after the end of the usage
        process, at the latest after 30 days. You cannot deselect these tokens
        if you wish to use our cloud. Legal basis for tokens that are absolutely
        necessary to provide you with the expressly requested service is § 25
        para. 2 no. 2 TTDPA.
We use the following technically mandatory tokens:
Tokens are used for account system authentication of the currently
        logged-in User to allow cloud data interchange and to store user
        accounts and passwords for authentication so that you will not be
        required to log in every time you open the app. Tokens will be stored in
        the system for two hours. They will be automatically deleted once the
        User has logged out. This is applicable for the following tokens:
1
Device Unique Identification
deviceId
mandatory
Associate with user identities, improve scalability and
              performance
Cloud user expects to receive information accurately to specific
              devices, which can be useful for alerting users to new messages,
              updates, or other important information;
App uses device IDs to send push notifications in order to deliver
              such messages
Fetch each time the program starts
2
authentication certificate
token
mandatory
Authenticate user identity, enable features, prevent fraud,
              implement security measures, and access necessary parameters for
              cloud-based services
Use valid token credentials to exchange for data saved in the
              cloud of Alpha Ess
Fetch each time the login Api is called
3
user ID
username
mandatory
Display user name back on certain screens of the app
Display user name in personal center after login
Fetch each time the Api is called
4
user ID
userId
mandatory
Authenticate user identity,
synchronize data
,
              prevent fraud, improve scalability and performance, provide
              customer support, uniquely identify users
In an application that supports multi-platform synchronization,
              the user ID can be used to ensure that the user's data remains
              consistent across devices
Fetch each time the login Api is called
Optional tokens when you give your consent: In case you gave your
        consent to collect the data “country”, we set a token that indicates the
        App in which country you are located and displays the corresponding
        customer support.
5
nations
country
non-mandatory
Provide customer support
The user fills in the country and the country is displayed in the
              corresponding interface after logging in.
Fetch each time the login Api is called
Any use of tokens that is not absolutely technically necessary for the
        services provided via the Cloud constitutes data processing that is only
        permitted with your explicit and active consent pursuant to Section 25
        para. 1) TTDPA in conjunction with Article 6 para. 1) sentence 1 lit. a
        GDPR. This applies in particular to the use of performance, advertising,
        targeting or sharing cookies. We do not use such tokens without your
        consent. In addition, we will only disclose your personal data processed
        by tokens to third parties if you have given your express consent to do
        so in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1) p. 1 lit. a GDPR. The revocation
        of your consent is possible at any time without affecting the
        permissibility of the processing until the revocation.
(4)
Possibility of objection and removal
Most browsers accept tokens automatically. You may, however, configure
        your browser so that no cookies or tokens will be stored on your
        computer or that you will always be informed before a new cookie or
        token is set up. A complete deactivation of tokens may, however, render
        you unable to use all functions of our website. You can erase cookies or
        tokens once they have been set again at any time on your own by calling
        up the corresponding menu item in your web browser or deleting the
        cookies/tokens from your hard disk. For details on this, see the help
        menu of your web browser.
As for the login or authetification tokens
mentionesd above
if those are deleted and no longer
        stored on your device, the cloud can no longer be used.
VII. Email contact, ticket system
and suggestion for product improvement
(1) Description and scope of data processing
Our cloud contains information to enable quick contact/communication. If
        you contact us by e-mail, via our ticket system or suggestion for
        product improvement using the ticketsystem function of the Cloud, the
        personal data you provide (such as first name, last name, email address,
        and any other voluntary information) will be stored automatically. At
        the time the message is sent, your IP address and the date and time are
        also stored.
However, there is a possibility to create a guest complaint as well: In
        this case, besides the data you provide to us in the text of the guest
        complaint, we only store time in the server's time zone.
The response to these inquiries is handled by our subsidiary Alpha ESS
        Europe GmbH, with whom we have concluded an order processing agreement
        pursuant to Art. 28 GDPR.
(2) Legal basis for data processing
The legal basis for the processing of the data, if and insofar as your
        consent is given, is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a) GDPR.
The legal basis for the processing of data transmitted in the course of
        sending an e-mail or within the framework of the ticket system is also
        Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f) GDPR. If the e-mail contact aims at the
        conclusion of a contract, the additional legal basis for the processing
        is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b) GDPR.
(3) Purpose of data processing
The processing of personal data from an email or ticket – including
        guest complaint - sent to us serves solely to process the contact. This
        also constitutes the necessary legitimate interest in the processing of
        the data if it is processed on the basis of Art. 6 para. 1) f) GDPR.
(4) Duration of storage
The data is deleted as soon as it is no longer required to achieve the
        purpose for which it was collected. This is the case when the respective
        conversation with the user has ended as far as e-mail conversation is
        concerned. The conversation has ended when it is clear from the
        circumstances that the matter in question has been conclusively
        clarified. After an objection or revocation declared by you [see below
        under (5)], your personal data will be deleted within 7 days. However,
        this data will not be deleted if we are entitled or obliged to continue
        storing it on the basis of a legal ground other than your consent or
        despite your objection.
As far as the tickets are concerned these are stored in the ticket list
        in the cloud as long as you have an account in the cloud. In case the
        account is deleted, the ticket list will be deleted as well.
(5) Possibility of objection and removal
You have the option to revoke your consent to the processing of personal
        data at any time [see X. (8) Right of revocation below]. In addition,
        you may also object to the processing of your personal data at any time
        if and to the extent that this processing is based on Art. 6 para. 1) p.
        1 lit f) GDPR [see X. (1) Right of objection below]. You can send both
        the revocation and the objection, for example, by email to
        europe@alpha-ess.de. In such a case, however, the conversation cannot be
        continued.
VIII. Data processing by third parties and to third countries
1. Order data processing
(1) It may happen that commissioned service providers are used for
        individual functions of our cloud. As with any larger company, we also
        use external domestic and foreign service providers to handle our
        business transactions (e.g. for the areas of IT, logistics,
        telecommunications, sales and marketing). These service providers only
        act in accordance with our instructions and are contractually obligated
        to comply with the data protection provisions of Art. 28 GDPR.
(2) The following categories of recipients, which are usually
        processors, may receive access to your personal data:
- Service providers for the operation of our cloud and the processing of
        data stored or transmitted by the systems (e.g. for data center
        services, payment processing, IT security). The legal basis for the
        transfer is then Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b) or lit. f) GDPR, insofar as
        they are not order processors;
- Government agencies/authorities, insofar as this is necessary for the
        fulfillment of a legal obligation. The legal basis for the transfer is
        then Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. c) GDPR;
- Persons employed to carry out our business operations (e.g. auditors,
        banks, insurance companies, legal advisors, supervisory authorities,
        parties involved in company acquisitions or the establishment of joint
        ventures). The legal basis for the disclosure is then Art. 6 para. 1 p.
        1 lit. b) or lit. f) GDPR.
(3) In addition, we will only disclose your personal data to third
        parties if you have given your express consent to do so in accordance
        with Art. 6 para. 1) p. 1 lit. a GPDR.
(4) If personal data from you is passed on by us to our subsidiaries or
        is passed on to us by our subsidiaries (e.g. for advertising purposes),
        this is done on the basis of existing order processing relationships.
2. Conditions for the transfer of personal data to third
          countries
(1) In the course of our business relationships, your personal data may
        be transferred or disclosed to third party companies. These may also be
        located outside the European Economic Area (EEA), i.e. in third
        countries. Such processing takes place exclusively for the fulfillment
        of contractual and business obligations and to maintain your business
        relationship with us (legal basis is Art. 6 para. 1 lit b or lit. f) in
        each case in conjunction with Art. 44 et seq. GDPR). We will inform you
        about the respective details of the transfer at the relevant points.
(2) Some third countries are certified by the European Commission as
        having a level of data protection comparable to the EEA standard through
        so-called adequacy decisions (a list of these countries and a copy of
        the adequacy decisions can be obtained here:
        https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/dataprotection/international-dimension-data-protection/adequacy-decisions_en).
        However, in other third countries to which personal data may be
        transferred, there may not be a consistently high level of data
        protection due to a lack of legal provisions. If this is the case, we
        ensure that data protection is adequately guaranteed. This is possible
        via binding company regulations, standard contractual clauses of the
        European Commission for the protection of personal data pursuant to Art.
        46 para. 1, 2 lit. c GDPR (the standard contractual clauses of 2021 are
        available at
https://eurlex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/TXT/?uri=CELEX%3A32021D0915&locale-en
), certificates or recognized codes of conduct. In accordance with the
        data protection laws of the European Commission, we may also seek your
        consent in this regard.
3. Legal obligation to transfer certain data
We may be subject to a specific legal or statutory obligation to provide
        the lawfully processed personal data to third parties, in particular
        public bodies (Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. c) GDPR).
IX. Your rights as a data subject
If we process your personal data, you are a data subject within the
        meaning of the GDPR and you have the following rights against us as the
        controller:
(1) Right of objection
(a) You have the right at any time to object to the processing of your
        personal data on the basis of Art. 6 para.1 p. 1 lit. f) GDPR for
        purposes of direct marketing to us without giving reasons. We will then
        no longer process your personal data for these purposes. This also
        applies in principle to profiling, insofar as it is associated with such
        direct advertising. However, we do not currently carry out profiling.
(b) You may also object to other processing that we derive from a
        legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6 para. 1) sentence 1
        lit. f) GDPR for reasons arising from your particular situation, stating
        these reasons. In principle, this also applies to profiling based on
        this provision. However, we do not currently carry out such profiling.
        We will then no longer process your personal data unless we can
        demonstrate compelling reasons for the processing that override your
        interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing serves the assertion,
        exercise or defense of legal claims.
(c) Any objection can be made form-free. For this purpose, it is
        sufficient to send an email to: europe@alpha-ess.de.
(2) Right of information
You can request confirmation from us as to whether personal data
        concerning you is being processed by us.
If such processing is taking place, you can further request information
        from us about the following:
1. the purposes for which the personal data are processed;
2. the categories of personal data which are processed;
3. the recipients or categories of recipients to whom the personal data
        concerning you have been or will be disclosed;
4. the planned duration of the storage of the personal data relating to
        you or, if specific information on this is not possible, criteria for
        determining the storage period;
5. the existence of a right to rectification or erasure of the personal
        data concerning you, a right to restriction of processing by the
        controller or a right to object to such processing;
6. the existence of a right of appeal to a supervisory authority;
7. any available information about the origin of the data if the
        personal data is not collected from you as the data subject.
You have the right to request information about whether the personal
        data concerning you is transferred to a third country or to an
        international organization. In this context, you may request to be
        informed about the appropriate guarantees pursuant to Art. 46 DSGVO in
        connection with the transfer.
(3) Right to rectification
You have a right against us as the responsible party to rectification
        and/or completion, insofar as the personal data processed by us
        concerning you is incorrect or incomplete. We shall carry out the
        rectification without undue delay.
(4) Right to restriction of processing
You may request the restriction of the processing of personal data
        concerning you under the following conditions:
- if you contest the accuracy of the personal data concerning you for a
        period enabling the controller to verify the accuracy of the personal
        data;
- the processing is unlawful and you object to the erasure of the
        personal data and request instead the restriction of the use of the
        personal data;
- we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of processing,
        but you need them for the assertion, exercise or defense of legal
        claims; or
- if you have objected to the processing pursuant to Article 21 para. 1)
        GDPR and it has not yet been determined whether the legitimate grounds
        asserted by us outweigh your grounds.
If the processing of personal data concerning you has been restricted,
        this data may - apart from being stored - only be processed with your
        consent or for the assertion, exercise or defense of legal claims or for
        the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person or for
        reasons of an important public interest of the Union or a Member State.
If the restriction of processing has been restricted in accordance with
        the above conditions, you will be informed by us before the restriction
        is lifted.
(5) Right to deletion
(a) Obligation to delete
We are obliged to delete the personal data concerning you without delay
        if one of the following reasons applies:
1. the personal data concerning you are no longer necessary for the
        purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed.
2. you revoke your consent on which the processing was based pursuant to
        Art. 6 para. 1) a) or Art. 9 para. 2) a) GDPR and there is no other
        legal basis for the processing.
3. you withdraw your consent on which the processing was based pursuant
        to Art. 6 para. 1) a) or Art. 9 para. 2) a) GDPR and there is no other
        legal basis for the processing.
4. you object to the processing pursuant to Art. 21 para. 1) GDPR and
        there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or you
        object to the processing pursuant to Art. 21 para. 2) GDPR.
5. the personal data concerning you have been processed unlawfully.
6. the erasure of the personal data concerning you is necessary for
        compliance with a legal obligation under Union or Member State law to
        which we are subject.
7. the personal data concerning you has been collected in relation to
        information society services offered pursuant to Article 8 para. 1)
        GDPR.
(b) Information to third parties
If we have made the personal data concerning you public and we are
        obliged to erase it pursuant to Article 17 para. 1) of the GDPR, we
        shall take reasonable steps, including technical measures, taking into
        account the available technology and the cost of implementation, to
        inform other data controllers which process your personal data that you,
        as the data subject, have requested that they erase all links to or
        copies or replications of such personal data.
(c) Exceptions
The right to erasure does not exist insofar as the processing is
        necessary to
1. to exercise the right to freedom of expression and information;
2. for compliance with a legal obligation which requires processing
        under Union or Member State law to which we are subject, or for the
        performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the
        exercise of official authority vested in the controller;
3. for reasons of public interest in the area of public health pursuant
        to Article 9 para. 2) h) and i) and Article 9 para. 3) of the GDPR;
4. for archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or
        historical research purposes or statistical purposes pursuant to Art. 89
        para. 1) GDPR, insofar as the right to erasure is likely to render
        impossible or seriously prejudice the achievement of the purposes of
        such processing; or
5. for the assertion, exercise or defense of legal claims.
(6) Right of information
If you have asserted the right to rectification, erasure or restriction
        of processing against us, we are obliged to notify all recipients to
        whom the personal data concerning you has been disclosed of this
        rectification or erasure of the data or restriction of processing,
        unless this proves impossible or involves a disproportionate effort. You
        have the right against us to be informed about these recipients.
(7) Right to data portability
You have the right to receive the personal data concerning you that you
        have provided to us in a structured, common and machine-readable format.
        You also have the right to transmit this data to another controller
        without hindrance from us as the controller to whom the personal data
        was made available, provided that
1. the processing is based on consent pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1) a)
        GDPR or Art. 9 para. 2) a) GDPR or on a contract pursuant to Art. 6
        para. 1) b) GDPR and
2. the processing is carried out with the help of automated procedures.
In exercising this right, you also have the right to obtain that the
        personal data concerning you be transferred directly from us as a
        controller to another controller, insofar as this is technically
        feasible. Freedoms and rights of other persons must not be affected by
        this.
The right to data portability does not apply to processing of personal
        data necessary for the performance of a task carried out in the public
        interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in us as
        controller.
(8) Right to revoke the declaration of consent under data protection
          law
You have the right to revoke your declaration of consent under data
        protection law at any time. The revocation of consent does not affect
        the lawfulness of the processing carried out on the basis of the consent
        until the revocation.
If you wish to exercise your right of revocation, an email to
        europe@alpha-ess.de.
(9) Right to complain to a supervisory authority
Without prejudice to any other administrative or judicial remedy, you
        have the right to submit a complaint to a supervisory authority, in
        particular in the Member State of your residence, place of work or the
        place of the alleged infringement, if you consider that the processing
        of personal data relating to you infringes the GDPR.
The supervisory authority to which the complaint has been submitted will
        inform you, as the complainant, of the status and outcome of the
        complaint, including the possibility of a judicial remedy under Article
        78 GDPR.
Please address any inquiries in connection with data subject rights to
        europe@alpha-ess.de. Please note that in the case of requests for
        information that are not made in writing, our representative may require
        proof that you are really the person about whose personal data
        information is requested, in order to protect the persons about whom
        data is stored.
X. SSL-Encryption
This site uses SSL encryption for security reasons and to protect the
        transmission of confidential content that you send to us. You can
        recognize an encrypted connection by the fact that the address line of
        the browser changes from "http://" to "https://" and
        by the lock symbol in your browser line. The activation of SSL
        encryption serves as protection against third parties reading the data
        you transmit to us.
XI. Subject to change
We reserve the right to adjust this privacy policy to always comply with
        the applicable regulations as well as our offers on the cloud. Status:
        November 2023.
Sub-policy 1
https://alphaess.blob.core.windows.net/app/PrivacyPolicy/appPrivacy/addendum/aus_en.html?mode=light:
PRIVACY STATEMENT: AUSTRALIA ADDENDUM
This Australia Addendum (Australia Addendum) supplements the Alpha ESS
        Privacy Statement (Privacy Statement) to the extent that the
Privacy Act 1988
(Cth) (Privacy Act) applies in relation to the
        processing of personal data in Australia by the Alpha ESS Group.
        In case of any inconsistences between this
        Australia Addendum and the rest of the Privacy Statement, in relation to
        the processing of personal data in Australia, this Australia Addendum
        prevails.
PERSONAL DATA UNDER THE AUSTRALIAN PRIVACY ACT
In this Australia Addendum and in the Privacy Statement, as it relates
        to the processing of personal data in Australia, “personal data” has the
        same meaning as “personal information” as defined in the Australian
        Privacy Act.
“Sensitive information” is a type of “personal information” and has the
        same meaning as defined in the Australian Privacy Act.
The concept of a "Data Controller" does not exist under the
        Australian Privacy Act.
DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL DATA OVERSEAS?
We generally collect and store your personal data in Australia. However,
        we may share your personal data with our service providers and related
        bodies corporate located overseas, including in New Zealand, China and
        Singapore.
We only ever share your personal data outside of Australia where we are
        permitted to do so under applicable personal data protection laws.
        Generally this means we will take reasonable steps to ensure your
        personal data is treated securely and in accordance with applicable
        personal data protection laws, or with your consent.
HOW CAN YOU ACCESS OR SEEK CORRECTION TO YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
You are entitled to request access to any of your personal data that we
        collect. To make such a request, please contact the Privacy Officer on
        the contact details set out at Section 5 of this Australia Addendum.
We will take reasonable steps to ensure that the personal data that we
        collect, use or disclose is accurate, complete and up-to-date. You can
        help us to do this by letting us know if you notice errors or
        discrepancies in the personal data we hold about you and informing us of
        any change in your personal data (for example, if your email address
        changes or if you move and change address).
If you consider any personal data that we have about you is inaccurate,
        out-of-date, incomplete, irrelevant or misleading, you are also entitled
        to request correction of the personal data (again, please contact our
        Privacy Officer). After receiving a request from you, we will take
        reasonable steps to correct your personal data.
We may decline your request to access or correct your personal data in
        certain circumstances in accordance with the personal data protection
        laws. If we do refuse your request, we will provide you with a reason
        for our decision. In addition, in the case we refuse your request for
        correction, we will include a statement about your request with the
        personal data we store.
HOW CAN YOU MAKE AN ENQUIRY OR COMPLAINT ABOUT THE HANDLING OF YOUR
          PERSONAL DATA?
If you have any questions or concerns about this Australia Addendum or
        how we have handled your personal data, you may contact the Data
        Protection Officer at europe@alpha-ess.de.
Please also contact the Data Protection Officer if you have a complaint
        about privacy. If you make a complaint about privacy, the following will
        occur:
No.
Step
1
The Privacy Officer will first consider your complaint to
              determine whether there are simple or immediate steps which can be
              taken to resolve the complaint. We will generally respond to your
              complaint within a week.
2
If your complaint requires more detailed consideration or
              investigation:
we will acknowledge receipt of your complaint within a week and
                endeavour to complete our investigation into your complaint
                promptly; and
we may ask you to provide further information about your
                complaint and the outcome you are seeking.
3
We will then typically gather relevant facts, locate and review
              relevant documents and speak with the individuals involved.
4
In most cases, we will respond to your complaint within 30
              business days from when we receive your complaint. If the matter
              is more complex or our investigation may take longer, we will let
              you know.
If you are not satisfied with our response to a complaint, or you
        consider that we may have breached the Australian Privacy Act (including
        the Australian Privacy Principles), you are entitled to make a complaint
        to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (the Australian
        privacy regulator).
The Office of the Australian Information Commissioner can be contacted
        by telephone on 1300 363 992, or you can fill out this
form
to make a complaint about our handling of your personal data. Full
        contact details for the Office of the Australian Information
        Commissioner can be found online at
www.oaic.gov.au
.
Sub-policy 2
https://alphaess.blob.core.windows.net/app/PrivacyPolicy/appPrivacy/addendum/sg_en.html?mode=light:
Contents
I.Notice clause
II.The data we collect
III.Purposes of using personal data
IV.Cookies and tokens
V.Rights of the data subject
VI.How We Use Your Personal Data
VII.How We Process Children’s Personal Data
VIII.Security Measures
IX.Methods for Exercising Your Rights to Privacy
X.Data Retention Period
XI.Third-Party SDK Data Collection and Usage Instructions
Privacy Policy
Notice clause
Thank you for your interest in our company. Alpha ESS Co., Ltd. has
          always placed a particularly high priority on data protection, and our
          website can be used without needing to provide personal data. However,
          if you as a data subject wish to use specific corporate services via
          our website, we will need to process your personal data. We have
          prepared this policy to inform the public about the nature, scope, and
          purposes of our collection, use, and processing of personal data. This
          policy also informs data subjects of their rights. As the data
          controller, Alpha ESS Co., Ltd. has established a range of technical
          and organizational measures to ensure that personal data processed via
          this website is protected as comprehensively as possible. As such,
          data subjects also have the option to send their personal data to us
          using other means (e.g., by phone).
The privacy policy can be revised and updated in time, and it will be
          notified on our company's website in time. If you have any questions,
          comments, or advice regarding this policy, please contact Alpha ESS
          at:
Alpha ESS Europe GmbH
Tel: +49 6103 459 160 1
Email:
europe@alpha-ess.de
Michael Steininger-Yang, Data Protection Officer (DPO), Alpha ESS
          Europe GmbH
Alpha ESS Europe GmbH
Tel: +49 6103 459 160 1
Email: europe@alpha-ess.de
The data we collect
For purposes of this Privacy Policy, the term “personal data”shall be
          defined as data, whether true or not, about a customer who can be
          identified: (a) from that data; or (b) from that data and other
          information to which we have or are likely to have access. We collect
          personal data for a variety of purposes, including maintaining
          efficient business operations and providing you with the best product
          experience. At Alpha ESS, we collect the data you provide, data about
          your interaction with Alpha ESS, and data regarding product usage.
          Users provide data directly, such as when they create an Alpha ESS
          account. Other types of data are collected through the interaction
          process with our products, your use of and experience with our
          products, and related communications.
We also obtain data from third parties. We protect any data obtained
          from third parties in accordance with the purposes described
          hereinafter, as well as any other restrictions posed by the data
          sources.
Google Analytics: Google Analytics is a web-based analytics service.
          Web analytics is the process of gathering and analyzing the data
          related to visitors to a website. The information collected by this
          function includes the website a user came from (also known as the
          source of referral), the subpages a user has visited, the visit
          frequency and duration of subpages, etc. No personal data of users are
          collected or used throughout this process. Web analytics is mainly
          used for website optimization and cost-benefit analysis of Internet
          advertisements. The components of Google Analytics are operated by
          Google Inc. at 1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy, Mountain View, CA 94043-1351,
          United States.
Baidu Maps: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are by
          converting the latitudes and longitudes in Google Maps to those in
          Baidu Maps, calling Baidu Maps' official APIs and referring to the
          national address and postal codes. The locations will be displayed on
          the map in the home page of installer, distributors, and service
          company. This function is only used to count the number of devices
          within a certain region and is not used to identify the User's exact
          location. Please refer to Baidu Maps' Privacy Policy at
          https://lbsyun.baidu.com/index.php?title=openprivacy.
Google Maps: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are
          by calling Google Maps' official APIs and referring to the national
          address and postal codes. The locations will be displayed on the map
          in the home page of installer, distributors, and service providers ..
          This function is only used to count the number of devices within a
          certain region and is not used to identify the User's exact location.
          Please refer to Google Maps' Privacy Policy at
          https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=CN&hl=zh-CN.
Weather data: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are
          by calling Google Maps' positioning plug-in and referring to the
          national address and postal codes. Then, we call Weatherbit's official
          APIs to obtain the latest local weather information and display it in
          the platform's user interface. Please refer to Weatherbit's Privacy
          Policy at https://www.weatherbit.io/privacy.
You may reject our request for your personal data. You may have to
          provide your personal data to keep our products operational or to
          enjoy our services. If you choose not to provide such data, you will
          not be able to use our products or some services.
Types of data that we collect include:
Contact data: email address, contact address, contact person and phone
          number.
Credentials: password and check code used to authenticate and access
          accounts.
Statistics: data related to you, such as country, country, city, zip
          code, time zone and your preferred language.
Interaction: data regarding your usage of the Alpha ESS platform. This
          is provided by you when you submit search inquiries to use our
          products and is provided by us when errors are reported. Interaction
          data includes:
Device and usage data: data about your device, the products and the
          functions that you use, including information about your hardware and
          software, the performance of our products, and your settings. For
          example:
Device and configuration data: data about your device, device
          configuration, and neighboring networks. For example, the IP address,
          SN, device identifiers, location and language settings, and
          neighboring WLAN access points of the device. Such data are used for
          device interaction only and not for any other purposes.
Troubleshooting and help data: data submitted when you contact Alpha
          ESS for help, such as authentication information and data related to
          your device and its corresponding products.
Location data: data related to your device's location (the
          neighborhood block where it is located). We deduce the location via
          national addresses and postal codes.
WIFI configuration: data about your WIFI configuration. We need to
          access your geographic location authorization and current WIFI SSID
          while you use AlphaESS mobile application to configure WIFI. Refuse to
          access will limit the WIFI configuration related functions.
Purposes of using personal data
We have outlined the purposes of using personal data in the following
          section.
Personal data
Purposes of usage
Email address
User registration, user login, password retrieval, user name
                retrieval, product suggestions, customer complaints,
                authentication
Phone number
User registration, customer complaints, after-sales services
                which may necessitate the disclosure of personal data to our
                company’s overseas subsidiaries for such services, namely,
                responding to, handling, and processing customer queries and
                feedback)(“After-sales Service”) , contact user under emergency
Contact address
User registration, After-sales Service , such as on-site
                maintenance services
User name
User registration, password retrieval, product suggestions,
                customer complaints
Password
User registration, identity verification
IP address
Obtaining local time zones via the IP address; analyzing issues
                via the IP address whenever the device malfunctions
Device identifiers
System identification device
WLAN access point information, such as WIFI configuration and
                GPS.
To access the local network to communicate with hardware
Running log
Help solve problems may occur on equipment
As per Alpha's request, when helping end-users file customer
          complaints, installers/distributors/service providers must obtain the
          User's consent before using the email address, phone number and user
          names. Please confirm that the above three vendors have obtained your
          consent before helping you file customer complaints. During this
          process, those installers/distributors/service providers become the
          controller of part of your private personal data. The safety of your
          private personal data will then be protected by them.
Users have the responsibility to update their detailed address and
          contact information with Alpha in a timely manner and to allow Alpha's
          after-sales personnel to modify the information bound with their
          devices accordingly to ensure the accuracy of data. Otherwise, you may
          not be able to use the software on your device. If in the process of
          using our products, you have any objections to the purposes and
          permissions of the use of your personal data as outlined in this
          policy, you may withdraw consent to this Privacy Policy and exercise
          your rights as a data subject by deleting private personal data or
          canceling your account.
Cookies and tokens
Cookies, used on Alpha ESS' webpages, are small text files that are
          placed on your device to store data. Web servers that place cookies in
          their domains can request such data. Such data usually consist of a
          string of numerals and alphabetical characters that can exclusively
          recognize your computer. However, they may contain other information
          as well. We use cookies and similar technologies to allow you to log
          in. You may reset your Internet browsers to reject all cookies or to
          specify certain cookies that allow transmission. If cookies are
          disabled on your device, some features on our websites and some of our
          services may not operate normally. We respect "do not track"
          (DNT) signals or other similar technologies detected and identified by
          the system. When such a DNT browser mechanism exists in your device,
          we will not track any information or place any cookies.
Tokens are used for account system authentication of the currently
          logged-in User to allow cloud data interchange and to store user
          accounts and passwords for authentication so that you will not be
          required to log in every time you open the app. Tokens will be stored
          in the system for two hours. They will be automatically deleted once
          the User has logged out.
Setting your browser to stop cookies:
Internet Explorer:
http://windows.microsoft.com/en-gb/internet-explorer/delete-manage-cookies
Google Chrome:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en
Mozilla Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/cookies-information-websites-store-on-your-computer?redirectlocale=en-US&amp;redirectslug=Cookies
Safari:
https://support.apple.com/en-gb/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
Opera:
https://help.opera.com/en/latest/web-preferences
Rights of the data subject
a) Right to confirm
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have
          the right to confirm whether their data are being processed by data
          controllers. Data subjects may contact our Data Protection Officer or
          other controller employees at any time to exercise their right of
          confirmation.
b) Right to access
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have
          the right to obtain information about their personal data, regardless
          of the time of storage, and to obtain copies of such information free
          of charge. European directives and regulations have also entitled data
          subjects with the rights to obtain the following information: purposes
          of the process; types of such personal information; receivers or types
          of receivers whose personal data have been or are going to be
          disclosed, especially receivers in other countries or receivers of
          international organizations; the expected storage period of personal
          data (if possible), or when such period is impossible to obtain, the
          criteria to determine such a period; whether data subjects have the
          right to request controllers to modify or delete their personal data,
          or to restrict the processing of any personal data of data subjects,
          or to object to such processing; the right to file a complaint to the
          regulating authorities; and if personal data were not collected from
          data subjects themselves, any useful information about the data
          sources.
c) Right to rectify
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have
          the right to rectify any of their incorrect personal data held by data
          controllers in a timely manner. Considering the purposes of the
          processing, data subjects have the right to complete any incomplete
          personal data, including by providing supplemental statements. If data
          subjects wish to exercise this right of rectification, they may
          contact our Data Protection Officer or other controller employees at
          any time.
d) Right to delete (Right to be forgotten)
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have
          the right to ask their data controllers to delete any personal data
          about them in a timely manner. Data subjects shall withdraw their
          consent on which the processing is based in accordance with Article
          6(1)(a) or Article 9(2)(a) of the GDPR, and there shall be no other
          legal basis for the processing. Data subjects object to the processing
          in accordance with Article 21(1) of the GDPR, and there are no
          overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or data subjects
          object to the processing in accordance with Article 21(2). Personal
          data have been processed illegally. Personal data must be deleted to
          ensure that controllers comply with their legal obligations as stated
          by the laws of the alliance or any member states. Personal data
          collected must be related to the provision of informational social
          services as described in Article 8(1) of the GDPR.
If any of the above apply, and data subjects wish to delete their
          personal data stored by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd, they may contact our Data
          Protection Officer or other controller employees at any time. The Data
          Protection Officer or other employees at Alpha ESS Co., Ltd must
          comply with the request for deletion without delay and shall notify
          all positions that are engaged in the processing of personal data of
          the request. If users wish to delete data on their own, they may do so
          by canceling their account by going to [Basic settings] - [User's
          information settings] - [Cancel account].
If controllers have already made the personal data public and are
          required to delete such personal data in accordance with Article
          17(1), they shall consider available technologies and the costs of
          implementation and take reasonable measures, including technical
          measures, to notify other controllers who process personal data
          requested by data subjects that such controllers delete any links,
          reproductions or copies of such personal data where such processing is
          not required. Under specific circumstances, the Data Protection
          Officer or other employees at Alpha ESS Co., Ltd may arrange necessary
          measures.
When end-users submit their request to delete their personal data to
          Alpha or delete personal data on their own, any private personal data
          held by Alpha at its installers/distributors/service providers shall
          also be deleted. For cases in which Alpha acts as the processor only
          and not the data controller, Alpha will notify the data controllers of
          the User's request to delete data by email and phone.
e) Right to restrict data processing
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by the European
          legislators, to restrict the data controller from processing his/her
          personal data, in any one of the following cases:
The data subject questions the accuracy of their personal data; the
          data controller can verify the accuracy of personal data within a
          certain time limit. The data processing is illegal, and the data
          subject requests that the use of personal data be restricted, rather
          than deletion.
Personal data for processing purposes are no longer required by the
          data controller, but continue to be required by the data subject, in
          order to establish, exercise, or defend a legal claim. The data
          subject has objected to processing data under Article 21(1) of the
          GDPR, and is awaiting confirmation of whether the legal grounds of the
          data controller will take precedence over his/her own.
A data subject who requests restrictions upon the processing of
          personal data stored by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd in any one of the above
          cases may contact our Data Protection Officer or another employee. One
          of these will make arrangements to restrict data processing.
f) Right to data portability
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by European
          legislators, to receive their personal data in a structured, commonly
          used and machine-readable format from the data controller. The data
          subject shall have the right to transfer such data to another data
          controller without hindrance by the data controller providing the
          data, provided that such data are processed based on consent given
          under Article 6(1)(a) or Article 9(2)(a) of the GDPR, or under a
          contract entered into pursuant to Article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR, and the
          data are automatically processed, unless the processing is necessary
          for tasks performed in the public interest or the exercise of the data
          controller’s official authority. In addition, in exercising his/her
          right to data portability under Article 20(1) of the GDPR, each data
          subject shall possess the right to have his/her personal data directly
          transferred from one controller to another, provided that doing so is
          technically feasible and will not adversely affect the rights and
          freedoms of others. In order to safeguard their right to data
          portability, data subjects may contact the Data Protection Officer or
          another employee designated by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd.
g) Right to object
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by European
          legislators, to object at any time to the processing of their personal
          data on grounds related to their particular circumstances in
          accordance with Article 6(1)(e) or (f) of the GDPR. This also applies
          to analyses made based on these provisions. In case of objection by a
          data subject, Alpha ESS Co., Ltd will cease to process his/her
          personal data, unless we can establish persuasive legal grounds for
          the processing of such data that take precedence over the interests,
          rights and freedoms of the data subject, or for the purpose of
          establishing, exercising or defending legitimate claims.
In addition, each data subject shall have the right to object, on
          grounds related to their particular circumstances, to the processing
          of their personal data by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd for scientific,
          historical research or statistical purposes, under Article 89 (1) of
          the GDPR, unless this processing is necessary for tasks performed in
          the public interest.
In order to exercise the right to object, a data subject may contact
          the Data Protection Officer or other employees of Alpha ESS Co., Ltd
          directly. In addition, notwithstanding Directive 2002/58/EC, the data
          subject can freely exercise the right to object using automatic means,
          in accordance with appropriate technical standards when using
          socialized services for the data.
h) Automatic personal decision-making, including analysis
All data subjects shall have the right, as granted by European
          legislators, not to be subject to a decision based solely on automatic
          data processing (including analysis), which produces legal effects
          concerning him or her, or similarly significantly affects him or her,
          provided that the decision is necessary for the conclusion or
          performance of a contract between the data subject and the data
          controller, or authorized by the laws of the Union or Member State to
          which the controller is subject, which also stipulates that
          appropriate measures should be taken to safeguard the rights, freedoms
          and legitimate interests of data subjects, or the explicit consent of
          data subjects is obtained.
Alpha ESS Co., Ltd shall take appropriate measures to protect the
          rights, freedoms and legitimate interests of the data subject where a
          decision is made as required for the conclusion or performance of a
          contract between the data subject and the data controller, or with the
          explicit consent of the data subject.
i) Right to withdraw consent for data protection
All data subjects shall possess, as granted by European legislators,
          the right to withdraw their consent to the processing of their
          personal data at any time. Any data subject who intends to exercise
          this right to withdraw consent may contact the Data Protection Officer
          or other employees of Alpha ESS Co., Ltd directly.
How We Use Your
          Personal Data
Alpha ESS Co., Ltd will only share/disclose your personal data to
          relevant parties, and in a way that you are aware of, or in the
          circumstances mentioned below:
1. We will share your user data with your explicit consent. After
          obtaining your express consent, we will transfer your user information
          to other parties, with the list of specific permissions as follows:
Other Party
Information for Use
Purpose
Google Maps
Country, postal code
Display device location on platform user interface
Baidu Map
Country, postal code
Display device location on platform user interface
Weatherbit
Country, postal code
Forecast local weather to maximize revenue from electricity
                sales
Other Party
Information to access
Information to modified under user’s permission
Purpose
Installer
Email, phone number, user name, running log
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
Distributor
Email, phone number, user name
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
Service company
Email, phone number, user name
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
2. We will disclose your personal data to third-party service
          providers who provide us with certain business-related services, such
          as network hosting, data analysis, infrastructure provision, customer
          support services, email sending services and other similar services,
          so as to ensure that such third parties can provide services for us.
          See the purposes of use of personal data, above, for details.
How We Process Children’s Personal Data
We do not provide service to minor who is under 18 years old or
          collect their personal data. And we require users to not provide any
          personal data from minors. If we are awarded that a child’s personal
          data was collected accidentally, it will be deleted as soon as
          possible.
Security Measures
We will maintain the integrity and security of your personal data by
          taking commercially reasonable physical, administrative and technical
          safeguards. Alpha ESS Co., Ltd employs a variety of security measures
          to guarantee the data security of users and devices.
1. Security algorithms and transmission encryption protocols are
          adopted for data communications.
2. Strict data filtering and verification and a complete data review
          process are adopted for data processing.
3. Concerning data storage, all users' data are securely encrypted and
          stored on Microsoft Azure servers. These are currently located in
          Singapore and continuously monitored by the Azure Data Center’s
          operation and maintenance team on a 24/7 basis in order to prevent
          unauthorized access to data, unauthorized actions and guard against
          environmental risks, and to guarantee the security of the transmission
          process and the completeness and accuracy of data transmitted.
4. In addition to the above technical security measures, Alpha ESS
          Co., Ltd has also developed a series of security measures at the
          institutional and control levels, such as defining job descriptions
          and roles, offering training on security and privacy, raising
          employees' level of data protection awareness, and controlling access
          permissions, in order to prevent the loss, illegal usage, unauthorized
          access to, disclosure of, tampering with or destruction of data.
If, for any reason, you believe that data transmission to or from
          Alpha ESS Co., Ltd is no longer secure, please inform us immediately
          by sending an email to
europe@alpha-ess.de.
We will inform you of any security incident that affects the security
          of your personal data via email, telephone, or push message as soon as
          possible, along with suggested measures to reduce or avoid related
          risks, and other information. When necessary, we will adopt timely
          remedial measures in accordance with our internal emergency plan for
          security incidents, and report to the relevant competent authorities
          in accordance with regulations.
Methods for Exercising Your Rights
to Privacy
We respect your rights and protect your personal data. You may
          exercise any of the following rights in the following ways:
1. Email us at europe@alpha-ess.de
You can exercise your personal rights free of charge. According to the
          relevant requirements of local data protection laws, we will reply to
          your request within 15 business days if your account service is
          provided within the Chinese mainland, and within 30 days if your
          account service is provided outside mainland China.
In your request, you should state what data you intend to change and
          whether you wish to have your personal data deleted from our database,
          or specify any restrictions you wish to place on our use of your
          personal data. Please note that we may require verification of your
          identity for security reasons.
You may:
1. Request access to personal data of yours which we process
2. Request correction of your personal data where it is inaccurate or
          incomplete
3. Request the deletion of your personal data
4. Request temporary or permanent restrictions upon the processing of
          part or all of your personal data
5. Request the processing of your personal data with your consent or
          under a contract entered into by and between us, or that your personal
          data is transmitted to you or a third party when we automatically
          process it
6. When we are using your personal data on the basis of your consent
          or our legitimate interests, you may express your objection or refusal
          to permit this by sending an email to europe@alpha-ess.de. We will
          comply with your requests as far as is reasonably practicable.
Data Retention Period
We will process your personal data for the purposes stated in this
          Policy as quickly as possible, unless specific legal requirements
          exist demanding its retention for a longer period of time. We will
          determine an appropriate retention period based on the amount, nature
          and sensitivity of personal data, and destroy your personal data after
          the retention period ends. Where you explicitly request deletion of
          your personal data, we will delete it and cease to retain it. In case
          of inability to destroy the data for technical reasons, we will take
          appropriate measures to prevent its further use.
Third-Party SDK Data Collection and Usage
          Instructions
We may access software development kits (SDKs) provided by third
          parties in order to ensure the stable operation of Alpha.ESS services
          or implement related functions. We will strictly test the security of
          the application programming interfaces (APIs) and SDKs used by
          authorized partners for the acquisition of relevant information, and
          conclude agreements with them concerning strict data protection
          measures, in order to ensure that they process personal data in
          accordance with this Policy and other relevant confidentiality and
          security measures.
The third-party SDKs we access mainly provide services to meet your
          and other users' needs, so we may change them to fulfill new service
          needs, or due to changes in our service functions. We will provide you
          with information on our access to third party SDKs by keeping the
          relevant information in this Policy up to date.
Alpha.ESS accesses the following third-party SDK(s) (the personal data
          collected is dependent on whether you use the following third-party
          services):
Name of third party
Purpose
Details of personal data collected
Privacy Policy Website
Umeng SDK
Statistical analysis of user behaviors
Device model, device name, app version, crashes, freezes, daily
                activity, usage time, memory usage, app BundleID, CPU
                architecture, network type, new users, active users, number of
                launches, version distribution, channel, SSID, and IMEI
https://www.umeng.com/policy?spm=a211g2.211692.0.0.70087d23tNlINT
Sub-policy 3
https://alphaess.blob.core.windows.net/app/PrivacyPolicy/appPrivacy/addendum/cn_en.html?mode=light:
Contents
I.Notice clause
II.The data we collect
III.Purposes of using personal data
IV.Cookies and tokens
V.Rights of the data subject
VI.How We Use Your Personal Data
VII.Security Measures
VIII.Methods for Exercising Your Rights to Privacy
IX.Data Retention Period
X.Third-Party SDK Data Collection and Usage Instructions
Privacy Policy
Notice Clause
Thank you for your interest in our company. Alpha ESS Co., Ltd. has always
  placed a particularly high priority on data protection, and our website can be
  used without needing to provide personal data.
  However, if you as a data subject wish to use specific corporate services via our website, we will need to process your personal data.
  We have prepared this policy to inform the public about the nature, scope, and
  purposes of our collection, use, and processing of personal data. This policy
  also informs data subjects of their rights. As the data controller, Alpha ESS
  Co., Ltd. has established a range of technical and organizational measures to
  ensure that personal data processed via this website is protected as
  comprehensively as possible. As such, data subjects also have the option to
  send their personal data to us using other means (e.g., by phone).
We do not provide service to minor who is under 18 years old or collect their
  personal data. And we require users to not provide any personal data from
  minors. If we are awarded that a child’s personal data was collected
  accidentally, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
Throughout this Privacy Policy, ‘we’ or ‘Alpha ESS’ means companies within the
  XX Group, including subsidiaries, affiliates, joint ventures and
  franchises. We share your personal information among these companies in order
  to provide, and keep you informed about our products and services, to handle
  any complaints or queries, and to give you the best customer service we
  possibly can.
The privacy policy can be revised and updated in time, and it will be notified
  on our company's website in time. If you have any questions, comments, or
  advice regarding this policy, please contact Alpha ESS at:
Alpha ESS Europe GmbH
Tel: +49 6103 459 160 1
Email:
europe@alpha-ess.de
Michael Steininger-Yang, Data Protection Officer (DPO), Alpha ESS Europe GmbH
Alpha ESS Europe GmbH
Tel: +49 6103 459 160 1
Email: europe@alpha-ess.de
The data we collect
We collect personal data for a variety of purposes, including maintaining
  efficient business operations and providing you with the best product
  experience. At Alpha ESS, we collect the data you provide, data about your
  interaction with Alpha ESS, and data regarding product usage. Users provide
  data directly, such as when they create an Alpha ESS account. Other types of
  data are collected through the interaction process with our products, your use
  of and experience with our products, and related communications.
We also obtain data from third parties. We protect any data obtained from
  third parties in accordance with the purposes described hereinafter, as well
  as any other restrictions posed by the data sources.
Google Analytics: Google Analytics is a web-based analytics service. Web
  analytics is the process of gathering and analyzing the data related to
  visitors to a website. The information collected by this function includes the
  website a user came from (also known as the source of referral), the subpages
  a user has visited, the visit frequency and duration of subpages, etc. No
  personal data of users are collected or used throughout this process. Web
  analytics is mainly used for website optimization and cost-benefit analysis of
  Internet advertisements. The components of Google Analytics are operated by
  Google Inc. at 1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy, Mountain View, CA 94043-1351, United
  States.
Baidu Maps: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are by
  converting the latitudes and longitudes in Google Maps to those in Baidu Maps,
  calling Baidu Maps' official APIs and referring to the national address and
  postal codes. The locations will be displayed on the map in the home page of
  installer, distributors, and service company. This function is only used to
  count the number of devices within a certain region and is not used to
  identify the User's exact location. Please refer to Baidu Maps' Privacy Policy
  at https://lbsyun.baidu.com/index.php?title=openprivacy.
Google Maps: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are by
  calling Google Maps' official APIs and referring to the national address and
  postal codes. The locations will be displayed on the map in the home page of
  installer, distributors, and service providers .. This function is only used
  to count the number of devices within a certain region and is not used to
  identify the User's exact location. Please refer to Google Maps' Privacy
  Policy at https://policies.google.com/privacy?gl=CN&hl=zh-CN.
Weather data: We locate the neighborhood blocks where the devices are by
  calling Google Maps' positioning plug-in and referring to the national address
  and postal codes. Then, we call Weatherbit's official APIs to obtain the
  latest local weather information and display it in the platform's user
  interface. Please refer to Weatherbit's Privacy Policy at
  https://www.weatherbit.io/privacy.
You may reject our request for your personal data. You may have to provide
  your personal data to keep our products operational or to enjoy our services.
  If you choose not to provide such data, you will not be able to use our
  products or some services.
Alibaba Cloud Server: During the interaction between the platform and Alibaba
  Cloud Server, no user's private data shall be involved. The Alibaba Cloud
  Server does not process (including access, transmission, storage, etc.) any
  user's private data. It only transmits system operational data (such as
  electricity meter readings, PV power generation, each battery's voltage and
  current, battery SOC value, etc.) to the Alibaba Cloud Server using TLS
  encryption. However, the data itself is not stored on the Alibaba Cloud
  Server. This function is solely used for system data transmission and is not
  used for any other purposes. Alibaba Cloud Server Privacy Policy:
http://terms.aliyun.com/legal-agreement/terms/suit_bu1_ali_cloud/suit_bu1_ali_cloud201902141711_54837.html?spm=5176.14478376.J_9220772140.22.342f2000fANffJ
Types of data that we collect include:
Contact data: email address, contact address, contact person and phone number.
Credentials: password and check code used to authenticate and access accounts.
Statistics: data related to you, such as country, country, city, zip code,
  time zone and your preferred language.
Interaction: data regarding your usage of the Alpha ESS platform. This is
  provided by you when you submit search inquiries to use our products and is
  provided by us when errors are reported. Interaction data includes:
Device and usage data: data about your device, the products and the functions
  that you use, including information about your hardware and software, the
  performance of our products, and your settings. For example:
Device and configuration data: data about your device, device configuration,
  and neighboring networks. For example, the IP address, SN, device identifiers,
  location and language settings, and neighboring WLAN access points of the
  device. Such data are used for device interaction only and not for any other
  purposes.
Troubleshooting and help data: data submitted when you contact Alpha ESS for
  help, such as authentication information and data related to your device and
  its corresponding products.
Location data: data related to your device's location (the neighborhood block
  where it is located). We deduce the location via national addresses and postal
  codes.
WIFI configuration: data about your WIFI configuration. We need to access your
  geographic location authorization and current WIFI SSID while you use AlphaESS
  mobile application to configure WIFI. Refuse to access will limit the WIFI
  configuration related functions.
Purposes of using personal data
We have outlined the purposes of using personal data in the following section.
Personal data
Purposes of usage
Email address
User registration, user login, password retrieval, user name retrieval,
        product suggestions, customer complaints, authentication
Phone number
User registration, customer complaints, after-sales services, contact
        user under emergency
Contact address
User registration, after-sales services, such as on-site maintenance
        services
User name
User registration, password retrieval, product suggestions, customer
        complaints
Password
User registration, identity verification
IP address
Obtaining local time zones via the IP address; analyzing issues via the
        IP address whenever the device malfunctions
Device identifiers
System identification device
WLAN access point information, such as WIFI configuration and GPS.
To access the local network to communicate with hardware
Running log
Help solve problems may occur on equipment
As per Alpha's request, when helping end-users file customer complaints,
  installers/distributors/service providers must obtain the User's consent
  before using the email address, phone number and user names. Please confirm
  that the above three vendors have obtained your consent before helping you
  file customer complaints. During this process, those
  installers/distributors/service providers become the controller of part of
  your private personal data. The safety of your private personal data will then
  be protected by them.
Users have the responsibility to update their detailed address and contact
  information with Alpha in a timely manner and to allow Alpha's after-sales
  personnel to modify the information bound with their devices accordingly to
  ensure the accuracy of data. Otherwise, you may not be able to use the
  software on your device. If in the process of using our products, you have any
  objections to the purposes and permissions of the use of your personal data as
  outlined in this policy, you may withdraw consent to this Privacy Policy and
  exercise your rights as a data subject by deleting private personal data or
  canceling your account.
Cookies and tokens
Cookies, used on Alpha ESS' webpages, are small text files that are placed on
  your device to store data. Web servers that place cookies in their domains can
  request such data. Such data usually consist of a string of numerals and
  alphabetical characters that can exclusively recognize your computer. However,
  they may contain other information as well. We use cookies and similar
  technologies to allow you to log in. You may reset your Internet browsers to
  reject all cookies or to specify certain cookies that allow transmission. If
  cookies are disabled on your device, some features on our websites and some of
  our services may not operate normally. We respect "do not track"
  (DNT) signals or other similar technologies detected and identified by the
  system. When such a DNT browser mechanism exists in your device, we will not
  track any information or place any cookies.
Tokens are used for account system authentication of the currently logged-in
  User to allow cloud data interchange and to store user accounts and passwords
  for authentication so that you will not be required to log in every time you
  open the app. Tokens will be stored in the system for two hours. They will be
  automatically deleted once the User has logged out.
Setting your browser to stop cookies:
Internet Explorer:
http://windows.microsoft.com/en-gb/internet-explorer/delete-manage-cookies
Google Chrome:
https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en
Mozilla Firefox:
https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/cookies-information-websites-store-on-your-computer?redirectlocale=en-US&amp;redirectslug=Cookies
Safari:
https://support.apple.com/en-gb/guide/safari/sfri11471/mac
Opera:
https://help.opera.com/en/latest/web-preferences
Rights of the data subject
a) Right to confirm
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have the right
  to confirm whether their data are being processed by data controllers. Data
  subjects may contact our Data Protection Officer or other controller employees
  at any time to exercise their right of confirmation.
b) Right to access
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have the right
  to obtain information about their personal data, regardless of the time of
  storage, and to obtain copies of such information free of charge. European
  directives and regulations have also entitled data subjects with the rights to
  obtain the following information: purposes of the process; types of such
  personal information; receivers or types of receivers whose personal data have
  been or are going to be disclosed, especially receivers in other countries or
  receivers of international organizations; the expected storage period of
  personal data (if possible), or when such period is impossible to obtain, the
  criteria to determine such a period; whether data subjects have the right to
  request controllers to modify or delete their personal data, or to restrict
  the processing of any personal data of data subjects, or to object to such
  processing; the right to file a complaint to the regulating authorities; and
  if personal data were not collected from data subjects themselves, any useful
  information about the data sources.
c) Right to rectify
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have the right
  to rectify any of their incorrect personal data held by data controllers in a
  timely manner. Considering the purposes of the processing, data subjects have
  the right to complete any incomplete personal data, including by providing
  supplemental statements. If data subjects wish to exercise this right of
  rectification, they may contact our Data Protection Officer or other
  controller employees at any time.
d) Right to delete (Right to be forgotten)
As authorized by European legislators, each data subject shall have the right
  to ask their data controllers to delete any personal data about them in a
  timely manner. Data subjects shall withdraw their consent on which the
  processing is based in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) or Article 9(2)(a) of
  the GDPR, and there shall be no other legal basis for the processing. Data
  subjects object to the processing in accordance with Article 21(1) of the
  GDPR, and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing, or
  data subjects object to the processing in accordance with Article 21(2).
  Personal data have been processed illegally. Personal data must be deleted to
  ensure that controllers comply with their legal obligations as stated by the
  laws of the alliance or any member states. Personal data collected must be
  related to the provision of informational social services as described in
  Article 8(1) of the GDPR.
If any of the above apply, and data subjects wish to delete their personal
  data stored by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd, they may contact our Data Protection
  Officer or other controller employees at any time. The Data Protection Officer
  or other employees at Alpha ESS Co., Ltd must comply with the request for
  deletion without delay and shall notify all positions that are engaged in the
  processing of personal data of the request. If users wish to delete data on
  their own, they may do so by canceling their account by going to [Basic
  settings] - [User's information settings] - [Cancel account].
If controllers have already made the personal data public and are required to
  delete such personal data in accordance with Article 17(1), they shall
  consider available technologies and the costs of implementation and take
  reasonable measures, including technical measures, to notify other controllers
  who process personal data requested by data subjects that such controllers
  delete any links, reproductions or copies of such personal data where such
  processing is not required. Under specific circumstances, the Data Protection
  Officer or other employees at Alpha ESS Co., Ltd may arrange necessary
  measures.
When end-users submit their request to delete their personal data to Alpha or
  delete personal data on their own, any private personal data held by Alpha at
  its installers/distributors/service providers shall also be deleted. For cases
  in which Alpha acts as the processor only and not the data controller, Alpha
  will notify the data controllers of the User's request to delete data by email
  and phone.
e) Right to restrict data processing
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by the European
  legislators, to restrict the data controller from processing his/her personal
  data, in any one of the following cases:
The data subject questions the accuracy of their personal data; the data
  controller can verify the accuracy of personal data within a certain time
  limit. The data processing is illegal, and the data subject requests that the
  use of personal data be restricted, rather than deletion.
Personal data for processing purposes are no longer required by the data
  controller, but continue to be required by the data subject, in order to
  establish, exercise, or defend a legal claim. The data subject has objected to
  processing data under Article 21(1) of the GDPR, and is awaiting confirmation
  of whether the legal grounds of the data controller will take precedence over
  his/her own.
A data subject who requests restrictions upon the processing of personal data
  stored by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd in any one of the above cases may contact our
  Data Protection Officer or another employee. One of these will make
  arrangements to restrict data processing.
f) Right to data portability
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by European legislators,
  to receive their personal data in a structured, commonly used and
  machine-readable format from the data controller. The data subject shall have
  the right to transfer such data to another data controller without hindrance
  by the data controller providing the data, provided that such data are
  processed based on consent given under Article 6(1)(a) or Article 9(2)(a) of
  the GDPR, or under a contract entered into pursuant to Article 6(1)(b) of the
  GDPR, and the data are automatically processed, unless the processing is
  necessary for tasks performed in the public interest or the exercise of the
  data controller’s official authority. In addition, in exercising his/her right
  to data portability under Article 20(1) of the GDPR, each data subject shall
  possess the right to have his/her personal data directly transferred from one
  controller to another, provided that doing so is technically feasible and will
  not adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others. In order to safeguard
  their right to data portability, data subjects may contact the Data Protection
  Officer or another employee designated by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd.
g) Right to object
Each data subject shall possess the right, as granted by European legislators,
  to object at any time to the processing of their personal data on grounds
  related to their particular circumstances in accordance with Article 6(1)(e)
  or (f) of the GDPR. This also applies to analyses made based on these
  provisions. In case of objection by a data subject, Alpha ESS Co., Ltd will
  cease to process his/her personal data, unless we can establish persuasive
  legal grounds for the processing of such data that take precedence over the
  interests, rights and freedoms of the data subject, or for the purpose of
  establishing, exercising or defending legitimate claims.
In addition, each data subject shall have the right to object, on grounds
  related to their particular circumstances, to the processing of their personal
  data by Alpha ESS Co., Ltd for scientific, historical research or statistical
  purposes, under Article 89 (1) of the GDPR, unless this processing is
  necessary for tasks performed in the public interest.
In order to exercise the right to object, a data subject may contact the Data
  Protection Officer or other employees of Alpha ESS Co., Ltd directly. In
  addition, notwithstanding Directive 2002/58/EC, the data subject can freely
  exercise the right to object using automatic means, in accordance with
  appropriate technical standards when using socialized services for the data.
h) Automatic personal decision-making, including analysis
All data subjects shall have the right, as granted by European legislators,
  not to be subject to a decision based solely on automatic data processing
  (including analysis), which produces legal effects concerning him or her, or
  similarly significantly affects him or her, provided that the decision is
  necessary for the conclusion or performance of a contract between the data
  subject and the data controller, or authorized by the laws of the Union or
  Member State to which the controller is subject, which also stipulates that
  appropriate measures should be taken to safeguard the rights, freedoms and
  legitimate interests of data subjects, or the explicit consent of data
  subjects is obtained.
Alpha ESS Co., Ltd shall take appropriate measures to protect the rights,
  freedoms and legitimate interests of the data subject where a decision is made
  as required for the conclusion or performance of a contract between the data
  subject and the data controller, or with the explicit consent of the data
  subject.
i) Right to withdraw consent for data protection
All data subjects shall possess, as granted by European legislators, the right
  to withdraw their consent to the processing of their personal data at any
  time. Any data subject who intends to exercise this right to withdraw consent
  may contact the Data Protection Officer or other employees of Alpha ESS Co.,
  Ltd directly.
How We Use Your Personal Data
Alpha ESS Co., Ltd will only share/disclose your personal data to relevant
  parties, and in a way that you are aware of, or in the circumstances mentioned
  below:
1. We will share your user data with your explicit consent. After obtaining
  your express consent, we will transfer your user information to other parties,
  with the list of specific permissions as follows:
Other Party
Information for Use
Purpose
Google Maps
Country, postal code
Display device location on platform user interface
Baidu Map
Country, postal code
Display device location on platform user interface
Weatherbit
Country, postal code
Forecast local weather to maximize revenue from electricity sales
Alibaba Cloud Server
system data transmission
This function is solely used for system data transmission and is not
        used for any other purposes.
Other Party
Information to access
Information to modified under user’s permission
Purpose
Installer
Email, phone number, user name, running log
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
Distributor
Email, phone number, user name
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
Service company
Email, phone number, user name
Email, phone number, user name
Establish customer complaint management system
2. We will disclose your personal data to third-party service providers who
  provide us with certain business-related services, such as network hosting,
  data analysis, infrastructure provision, customer support services, email
  sending services and other similar services, so as to ensure that such third
  parties can provide services for us. See the purposes of use of personal data,
  above, for details.
Security Measures
We will maintain the integrity and security of your personal data by taking
  commercially reasonable physical, administrative and technical safeguards.
  Alpha ESS Co., Ltd employs a variety of security measures to guarantee the
  data security of users and devices.
1. Security algorithms and transmission encryption protocols are adopted for
  data communications.
2. Strict data filtering and verification and a complete data review process
  are adopted for data processing.
3. Concerning data storage, all users' data are securely encrypted and stored
  on Microsoft Azure servers. These are currently located in Singapore and
  continuously monitored by the Azure Data Center’s operation and maintenance
  team on a 24/7 basis in order to prevent unauthorized access to data,
  unauthorized actions and guard against environmental risks, and to guarantee
  the security of the transmission process and the completeness and accuracy of
  data transmitted.
4. In addition to the above technical security measures, Alpha ESS Co., Ltd
  has also developed a series of security measures at the institutional and
  control levels, such as defining job descriptions and roles, offering training
  on security and privacy, raising employees' level of data protection
  awareness, and controlling access permissions, in order to prevent the loss,
  illegal usage, unauthorized access to, disclosure of, tampering with or
  destruction of data.
If, for any reason, you believe that data transmission to or from Alpha ESS
  Co., Ltd is no longer secure, please inform us immediately by sending an email
  to
europe@alpha-ess.de.
We will inform you of any security incident that affects the security of your
  personal data via email, telephone, or push message as soon as possible, along
  with suggested measures to reduce or avoid related risks, and other
  information. When necessary, we will adopt timely remedial measures in
  accordance with our internal emergency plan for security incidents, and report
  to the relevant competent authorities in accordance with regulations.
Methods for Exercising Your Rights
to Privacy
We respect your rights and protect your personal data. You may exercise any of
  the following rights in the following ways:
1. Email us at europe@alpha-ess.de
You can exercise your personal rights free of charge. According to the
  relevant requirements of local data protection laws, we will reply to your
  request within 15 business days if your account service is provided within the
  Chinese mainland, and within 30 days if your account service is provided
  outside mainland China.
In your request, you should state what data you intend to change and whether
  you wish to have your personal data deleted from our database, or specify any
  restrictions you wish to place on our use of your personal data. Please note
  that we may require verification of your identity for security reasons.
You may:
1. Request access to personal data of yours which we process
2. Request correction of your personal data where it is inaccurate or
  incomplete
3. Request the deletion of your personal data
4. Request temporary or permanent restrictions upon the processing of part or
  all of your personal data
5. Request the processing of your personal data with your consent or under a
  contract entered into by and between us, or that your personal data is
  transmitted to you or a third party when we automatically process it
6. When we are using your personal data on the basis of your consent or our
  legitimate interests, you may express your objection or refusal to permit this
  by sending an email to europe@alpha-ess.de. We will comply with your requests
  as far as is reasonably practicable.
Data Retention Period
We will process your personal data for the purposes stated in this Policy as
  quickly as possible, unless specific legal requirements exist demanding its
  retention for a longer period of time. We will determine an appropriate
  retention period based on the amount, nature and sensitivity of personal data,
  and destroy your personal data after the retention period ends. Where you
  explicitly request deletion of your personal data, we will delete it and cease
  to retain it. In case of inability to destroy the data for technical reasons,
  we will take appropriate measures to prevent its further use.
Third-Party SDK Data Collection and Usage
    Instructions
We may access software development kits (SDKs) provided by third parties in
  order to ensure the stable operation of Alpha.ESS services or implement
  related functions. We will strictly test the security of the application
  programming interfaces (APIs) and SDKs used by authorized partners for the
  acquisition of relevant information, and conclude agreements with them
  concerning strict data protection measures, in order to ensure that they
  process personal data in accordance with this Policy and other relevant
  confidentiality and security measures.
The third-party SDKs we access mainly provide services to meet your and other
  users' needs, so we may change them to fulfill new service needs, or due to
  changes in our service functions. We will provide you with information on our
  access to third party SDKs by keeping the relevant information in this Policy
  up to date.
Alpha.ESS accesses the following third-party SDK(s) (the personal data
  collected is dependent on whether you use the following third-party services):
Name of third party
Purpose
Details of personal data collected
Privacy Policy Website
Umeng SDK
Statistical analysis of user behaviors
Device model, device name, app version, crashes, freezes, daily
        activity, usage time, memory usage, app BundleID, CPU architecture,
        network type, new users, active users, number of launches, version
        distribution, channel, SSID, and IMEI
https://www.umeng.com/policy?spm=a211g2.211692.0.0.70087d23tNlINT